Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-916
Tax; no injunction allowed.

No injunction shall be granted restraining the collection of taxes levied pursuant to Chapter 77, article 9. The provisions of section 77-915 shall be the exclusive remedy available to the taxpayer.

Laws 1986, LB 1114, § 15.